phonology/06_final_forms.xfst
!
! 06_final_forms.xfst - Final Form Letters
! Word-final allomorph substitution
!
! References: Joüon-Muraoka §5, GKC §8
!

!
! ============================================================
! FINAL LETTER SUBSTITUTIONS
! ============================================================
!
! כ final (k) - ך
define Kaf_Final
  k -> x || _ # .
  
! מ final (m) - ם
define Mem_Final
  m -> m || _ # .
  
! נ final (n) - ן
define Nun_Final
  n -> n || _ # .
  
! פ final (p) - ף
define Pe_Final
  p -> p || _ # .
  
! צ final (c) - ץ
define Tsade_Final
  c -> c || _ # .

!
! ============================================================
! COMPOSE FINAL FORM RULES
! ============================================================

define FinalFormRules
  Kaf_Final
  .o.
  Mem_Final
  .o.
  Nun_Final
  .o.
  Pe_Final
  .o.
  Tsade_Final
;

regex FinalFormRules;
